Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5283.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) The Honor and Remember flag created by Honor and Remember Inc. is designated as the official symbol of this state's remembrance and commitment to honor the service and sacrifice of members of the United States Armed Forces who have given their lives in the line of duty. (2) The Honor and Remember flag may be displayed anywhere the United States flag is displayed, including the Michigan state capitol, all state-owned and state-operated properties, and on any local government property in this state. (3) The Honor and Remember flag may be flown on the following days: (a) Armed Forces Day, the third Saturday in May. (b) Memorial Day, the last Monday in May. (c) Flag Day, June 14. (d) Independence Day, July 4. (e) National POW/MIA Recognition Day, the third Friday in September. (f) Gold Star Mother's Day, the last Sunday in September. (g) Veterans Day, November 11. (h) Any day flags are at half-staff to honor a military member killed during service, as ordered by the governor. (i) Any other day considered appropriate by a local unit of government or a state agency.